Ohio, session 136, HB445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 167.02 and 167.04 be amended and 6
sections 713.41, 713.42, and 713.43 of the Revised Code be 7
enacted to read as follows: 8
Sec. 167.02. (A) Membership in the regional council shall 9
be the counties, municipal corporations, townships, special 10
districts, school districts, and other political subdivisions 11
entering into the agreement establishing the council or admitted 12
to membership subsequently pursuant to the agreement 13
establishing the council or the bylaws of the council. 14
Representation on the council may be in the manner as provided 15
in the agreement establishing the council. A regional council 16
that is a metropolitan planning organization shall not include a 17
a majority of voting members from any one county. 18
(B) If the agreement establishing the council does not set 19

H. B. No. 445 Page 2
As Introduced
forth the manner for determining representation on the council 20
such representation shall consist of one representative from 21
each county, municipal corporation, township, special district, 22
school district, or other political subdivision entering into 23
the agreement, or subsequently admitted to membership in the 24
council. The representative from each member county, municipal 25
corporation, township, special district, school district, or 26
other political subdivision shall be elected chief executive 27
thereof, or, if such county, municipal corporation, township, 28
special district, school district, or other political 29
subdivision does not have an elected chief executive, a member 30
of its governing body chosen by such body to be its 31
representative. 32
(C) Records containing the names of the political 33
subdivisions that are members of a regional council of 34
governments or the names of the representatives from those 35
political subdivisions who serve on the council are public 36
records within the meaning of section 149.43 of the Revised 37
Code, and those names are not considered to be trade secrets 38
under section 1333.61 of the Revised Code. 39
(D) The director of development services shall assist the 40
council in securing the cooperation of all appropriate agencies 41
of the state or of the United States to aid in promoting the 42
orderly growth and development of the area, solving the problems 43
of local government, and discharging the responsibilities and 44
duties of local government in the most efficient possible 45
manner. 46
(E) Any county, municipal corporation, township, special 47
district, school district, or other political subdivision which 48
has become a member of the council may withdraw by formal action 49

H. B. No. 445 Page 3
As Introduced
of its governing board and upon sixty days notice to council 50
after such action, or in the manner provided in the agreement 51
establishing the council, provided no such procedure relative to 52
withdrawals in the agreement establishing the council shall 53
require the political subdivision desiring to withdraw to retain 54
its membership in the council for a period in excess of two 55
years. 56
Sec. 167.04. (A) The regional council of governments shall 57
adopt by-laws, by a majority vote of its members, designating 58
the officers of the council and the method of their selection, 59
creating a governing board that may act for the council as 60
provided in the by-laws, and providing for the conduct of its 61
business. The individual who serves as the chief executive 62
officer of a regional council of governments that is a 63
metropolitan planning organization shall not hold employment 64
outside of this state. 65
(B) The by-laws of the regional council of governments 66
shall provide for the appointment of a fiscal officer, who may 67
hold any other office or employment with the council, and who 68
shall receive, deposit, invest, and disburse the funds of the 69
council in the manner authorized by the by-laws or action by the 70
council. 71
(C) The by-laws of a regional council of governments the 72
members of which include, under sections 167.01 and 167.02 of 73
the Revised Code, at least eight counties may include a 74
provision authorizing member attendance and voting at council 75
meetings either in person or by proxy. 76
(D) The officers of the council shall notify the auditor 77
of state of the regional council's formation, provide a copy of 78
the council's by-laws, and provide on a form prescribed by the 79

H. B. No. 445 Page 4
As Introduced
auditor of state any other information regarding the regional 80
council that the auditor of state considers necessary. 81
The council shall take no official action, other than 82
formation, before notifying the auditor of state of its 83
formation in accordance with this section. Any official action 84
the council takes before making that notification, including 85
entering into any contract, is void. 86
Sec. 713.41. (A) As used in this section : 87
(1) "Metropolitan planning organization" has the same 88
meaning as in section 5552.01 of the Revised Code. 89
(2) "Commuter statistics" means the population of 90
individuals who work at locations that are different from where 91
those individuals live, as determined by the five-year commuting 92
flow estimates published in the American community survey by the 93
United States census bureau and that are based on the most 94
recent federal decennial census data. 95
(3) "Eligible county" means a county that is part of a 96
metropolitan planning organization and in which twenty-five per 97
cent of the workforce population of that county commutes to an 98
adjoining county that is partially or wholly located in a 99
different metropolitan planning organization, according to the 100
most recent commuter statistics and excluding any percentage of 101
the workforce that commutes to a different state. 102
(B)(1) The board of county commissioners of an eligible 103
county may adopt a resolution requesting that the governor 104
redesignate that eligible county into a different, adjoining 105
metropolitan planning organization. 106
(2) A board that adopts a resolution in accordance with 107
division (B)(1) of this section shall send a copy of that 108

H. B. No. 445 Page 5
As Introduced
resolution to the governor. 109
(C)(1) Not later than sixty days after receipt of the copy 110
of the resolution in accordance with division (B) of this 111
section, the governor shall determine whether to redesignate the 112
eligible county. 113
(2) If the governor determines that the eligible county 114
should be redesignated, the governor shall take the necessary 115
steps to redesignate that county into the adjoining metropolitan 116
planning organization. 117
Sec. 713.42. (A) As used in this section, "metropolitan 118
planning organization" has the same meaning as in section 119
5552.01 of the Revised Code. 120
(B) A metropolitan planning organization shall not adopt 121
policies, regulations, or standards that are more stringent than 122
any corresponding state and federal policies, regulations, or 123
standards. 124
Sec. 713.43. (A) As used in this section, "metropolitan 125
planning organization" has the same meaning as in section 126
5552.01 of the Revised Code. 127
(B) The governing body of a metropolitan planning 128
organization shall not include a majority of voting members from 129
one county. 130
Section 2. That existing sections 167.02 and 167.04 of the 131
Revised Code are hereby repealed. 132